New York, session 2025-2026, S3778.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 212 of the judiciary law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (z) to read as follows: 3 (z) Submit annually, on or before the fifteenth day of March, to the 4 legislature and the governor a report on the administration, function 5 and effectiveness of all drug treatment courts operating in the state as 6 part of the Drug Treatment Court Program during the preceding year. Such 7 report shall include, but not be limited to, an accounting of expendi- 8 tures of state, local, federal, and other funds utilized in support of 9 the Drug Treatment Court Program. Such report shall also include avail- 10 able information on drug court staffing levels and levels of partic- 11 ipation of community service providers, including non-profit organiza- 12 tions, who provided treatment or other services to drug court 13 participants. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05355-01-5